Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1932.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 230.19 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
During an Oklahoma Motor Carrier Safety and Hazardous Materials
Transportation Act administrative hearing, a motor carrier organized
as a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability
partnership, or partnership may be represented by an officer,
member, manager, or partner of the entity at the administrative
hearing if the motor carrier chooses not to be represented by an
attorney.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

Passed the Senate the 25th day of February, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1932 Page 2